Louisiana, session 2026, HB148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 5 between United States Highway 84
and Louisiana Highway 3015 in Logansport, Louisiana, DeSoto Parish shall be known and
is hereby designated as the "Eugene Washington Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby directed
to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local or private
monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs for material,
fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum of seven
hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1